Wyoming, session 2025, SF0008.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 7-3-510 by creating a new subsection
(e) and 35-21-106 by creating a new subsection (f) are
amended to read:
7-3-510. Service of order; duration and extension of
order; violation; remedies not exclusive; order effective
during appeal or review.
(e) An order of protection granted under W.S. 7-3-506
through 7-3-512 shall remain effective during the pendency
of any appeal or review of the order of protection or any
decision to modify or extend the order of protection,
unless a court orders a stay during the pendency of the
appeal or review.
35-21-106. Service of order; duration and extension
of order; violation; remedies not exclusive; order
effective during appeal or review.
(f) An order of protection granted under this act
shall remain effective during the pendency of any appeal or
review of the order of protection or any decision to modify
or extend the order of protection, unless a court orders a
stay during the pendency of the appeal or review.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0008
ENROLLED ACT NO. 34, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2